Georgia statutes. TITLE 7 Banking And Finance
PART 3 Powers of Banks
7-1-293.
Savings banks and state savings and loan associations.

A bank desiring to be accorded treatment under this chapter as a savings bank or state savings and loan association shall so state in its articles.

A savings bank or a state savings and loan association may apply to the department for permission to relinquish its status as a savings bank or state savings and loan association and become a commercial bank by filing an appropriate amendment to its articles. The department may exercise its discretion in determining whether to approve such a change and shall consider in connection therewith the same criteria considered in approving the original articles of incorporation.

A savings bank shall provide its depositors with deposit insurance coverage pursuant to those deposit insurance provisions of this chapter applicable to commercial banks. A state savings and loan association shall provide its depositors, but not its shareholders, with deposit insurance coverage.

Reserved.

The conversion, merger, or consolidation of a federal savings and loan association or federal savings bank, including a federal mutual savings and loan association or federal mutual savings bank, shall be accomplished pursuant to the same procedures as are prescribed in this chapter for a conversion, merger, or consolidation involving a national bank, provided that the approval of such conversion by the members of such association or bank shall be by such vote as is required in the articles of association and bylaws of such association or bank. A federal mutual savings and loan association or federal mutual savings bank shall upon conversion be and be known as a mutual savings bank. In considering any plan for the conversion, merger, or consolidation of a federal savings and loan association or federal savings bank, the department shall not approve the plan unless it is satisfied that such plan is fair and equitable to all borrowers, depositors, and shareholders.

The conversion, merger, or consolidation of a federal mutual savings and loan association holding company or federal mutual savings bank holding company shall be accomplished pursuant to the same procedures as are prescribed in this chapter for a conversion, merger, or consolidation involving a national bank, provided that the approval of such conversion shall be by such vote of the members of such holding company as is required in the articles of association and bylaws of such holding company but shall be further conditioned upon the conversion of the federal savings and loan association or federal savings bank subsidiary of such holding company to a savings bank contemporaneously with the holding company’s conversion.

A state mutual savings bank holding company shall be subject to all of the rules and regulations of the department as if it were a commercial bank organized under this chapter, provided that it shall be authorized to own the stock of a savings bank subsidiary.

With respect to the corporate governance of a mutual savings bank or mutual savings bank holding company, the members of the savings bank or holding company as defined in the articles of association, subject to the approval of the department, shall be the equivalent of the shareholders of a commercial bank or bank holding company having such rights, preferences, and powers and subject to such limitations as may be contained in the rules and regulations of the department and in the articles of association and bylaws of the savings bank or holding company approved by the department.

Except as provided therein, Article 1 of this chapter and all other parts of this article shall apply to all mutual savings banks, savings banks, and state savings and loan associations and unless specifically exempt therein, all rules and regulations promulgated by the department applicable to banks shall be applicable to mutual savings banks, savings banks, and state savings and loan associations.

Unless otherwise provided, the provisions of Part 18 of this article applicable to bank holding companies shall be applicable to mutual savings bank holding companies and unless specifically exempt therein, all rules and regulations promulgated by the department applicable to bank holding companies shall be applicable to mutual savings bank holding companies.

In the event that a federal mutual savings and loan association or federal mutual savings bank upon conversion to a savings bank would own or hold assets or engage in any business that would not be allowable for a commercial bank, then the plan of conversion presented to the department shall include a plan for disposal of such assets or the termination of such nonconforming business within a reasonable time but in no event longer than four years from the date of the conversion.

History.

Code 1933, § 41A-1314, enacted by Ga. L. 1974, p. 705, § 1; Ga. L. 1981, p. 1566, § 2; Ga. L. 1982, p. 3, § 7; Ga. L. 1982, p. 1781, § 1; Ga. L. 1983, p. 602, § 9; Ga. L. 1987, p. 1586, § 5; Ga. L. 1988, p. 13, § 7; Ga. L. 1992, p. 6, § 7; Ga. L. 1997, p. 485, § 13; Ga. L. 2016, p. 390, § 7-7/HB 811; Ga. L. 2021, p. 323, § 4/HB 111.

The 2021 amendment,

effective July 1, 2021, deleted “or conversion of a building and loan association” following “federal savings bank” in the last sentence in subsection (e).

7-1-294.
Transaction of business on holidays and outside of banking hours.

Notwithstanding any existing provisions of law relative to the time of maturity or presentment of negotiable instruments, any financial institution doing business in this state may, at its option, outside of regular banking hours on any day, or at any time on a day which is in whole or in part a holiday, pay, certify, or accept negotiable or nonnegotiable instruments including a demand instrument dated on the holiday on which it is presented for payment, certification, or acceptance and transact any other business which would be valid if done on a business day during regular banking hours.

Nothing in this Code section shall require any financial institution which remains open for business on all or a part of any holiday to do or perform any act on that day in its capacity as a collection agent which would not be required of it if it were closed on such holiday or part holiday.

History.

Code 1933, § 14-1809.2, enacted by Ga. L. 1949, p. 352, § 1; Ga. L. 2017, p. 193, § 7/HB 143.

Cross references.

Public, legal and religious holidays, §§

1-4-1

,

1-4-2

.

Definition of “banking day” for purposes of the Uniform Commercial Code, §

11-4-104

.

7-1-295.
Transaction fees charged by operators of automated teller machines.

An operator of an automated teller machine in this state may charge a transaction fee to the customer using the machine. An agreement to share automated teller machines may not prohibit, limit, or restrict the right to charge such transaction fees and no such agreement may prohibit, limit, or restrict the right of one or more financial institutions to enter into an agreement not to charge such transaction fees to their common customers.

History.

Code 1981, §

7-1-295

, enacted by Ga. L. 1993, p. 917, § 3; Ga. L. 1997, p. 575, § 1.

7-1-296.
“Federal power” defined; construction with federal law; notifications; objections; authority; construction.

For purposes of this Code section, the term “federal power” means any banking or corporate power, right, benefit, privilege, or immunity of a national bank, the deposits of which are federally insured, that may be exercised by a national bank doing business in this state pursuant to the National Bank Act, 12 U.S.C. Section 1, et seq.; any other federal statute; or any regulation, ruling, circular, bulletin, order, or interpretation issued by the Office of the Comptroller of the Currency. Such term shall include only the provisions set forth above which were effective on January 1, 2018.

Notwithstanding any other provisions of law, a bank may exercise any federal power while a national bank may also exercise such power subject to the same limitations and restrictions as are applicable to national banks, provided that the requirements of subsection (d) of this Code section have been satisfied. Nothing in this subsection shall be construed as authorizing a bank chartered by this state to exercise a federal power prior to compliance with subsection (d) of this Code section.

Notwithstanding any other provisions of law, to the extent the National Bank Act, 12 U.S.C. Section 1, et seq., or any other federal law or regulation in effect on January 1, 2018, precludes or preempts or has been determined to preclude or preempt the application of any provision of law, rule, or regulation of this state, as to any national bank doing business in this state, a bank may also exercise such power authorized by the preclusion or preemption subject to the same limitations and restrictions as are applicable to a national bank, provided that the requirements of subsection (d) of this Code section have been satisfied. Nothing in this subsection shall be construed as authorizing a bank chartered by this state to exercise a federal power prior to compliance with subsection (d) of this Code section.

In furtherance of the commissioner’s statutory duties to regulate, supervise, and examine, a bank shall notify the commissioner in writing by certified or registered mail that, pursuant to subsection (b) or (c) of this Code section, it intends to exercise a federal power or to avail itself of any federal preclusion or preemption of any provision of law, rule, or regulation of this state. Such notice shall include the specific federal authorization of the activity to be utilized, the proposed action to be undertaken by the bank, documentation indicating that the bank satisfies the prescribed federal standards, if any, to engage in the activity, and such other information as may be required by the department. Upon receipt of such notice, the commissioner shall determine whether the exercise of any federal power or the availing of any federal preclusion or preemption, or any part thereof, by the bank is inconsistent with the purposes of this chapter or presents undue risk to the safety and soundness of the banking system. In making such a determination, the commissioner shall consider the financial condition of the bank, the regulatory safety and soundness ratings of the bank, the ability of bank management to administer and supervise the activity, and the overall impact on the safety and soundness to all other state chartered banks. Based on such a determination, the commissioner may object to the exercise of the federal power, in whole or in part, or to the federal preclusion or preemption of the law, rule, or regulation of this state, in whole or in part, including objecting to a level or quantity above which a bank may be seeking to exercise a federal power or availing itself of any federal preclusion or preemption of law, rule, or regulation of this state. If the commissioner so objects, the commissioner shall deliver such objection in writing by certified or registered mail to the bank within 45 days of receipt of the notice; provided, however, that the commissioner may extend such period of review for an additional 45 days by providing the bank with written notice of such extension prior to the expiration of the initial notice period. If the commissioner sends such an objection, the federal power, preclusion, or preemption, or the part thereof, objected to by the commissioner shall not be exercised by the bank pursuant to subsections (b) and (c) of this Code section. The objection by the commissioner of a bank’s intent to exercise a federal power or avail itself of any federal preclusion or preemption shall not preclude such bank from providing notice to the department of its intent to exercise the same federal power or to avail itself of the same federal preclusion or preemption at a later date; provided, however, that the requirements of this subsection shall be applicable for any such additional notice. Further, in the event a bank determines, after satisfying the notice provisions of this subsection, that it no longer wishes to exercise a federal power or avail itself of any federal preclusion or preemption, then such bank shall provide written notice of such fact to the commissioner by certified or registered mail.

Notwithstanding the provisions of Code Section 7-1-70, the department shall publish information stating the federal powers that are being exercised or federal preemptions or preclusions that are being utilized by each bank. All other information related to the notices or objections provided under subsection (d) of this Code section are governed by Code Section 7-1-70.

Notwithstanding any other provisions of law, a bank may exercise any power that was granted through an order or ruling declared by the commissioner on or before January 1, 2018, pursuant to the current or former provisions of Code Section 7-1-61, 7-1-61.1, or 7-6A-12 and which has not been rescinded or withdrawn.

Any federal power or activity authorized and exercised or conducted pursuant to this Code section shall be independent from, and in addition to, any other powers granted to banks under applicable laws of this state or rules or regulations promulgated thereunder. The express and incidental powers granted to banks under the Official Code of Georgia Annotated are not limited or otherwise restricted by this Code section.

Nothing in this Code section shall be construed as limiting the commissioner’s authority conferred by this chapter, including the powers granted under Code Sections 7-1-61 and 7-1-61.1.

Nothing in this Code section shall be construed as authorizing the imposition of interest rates by a bank in excess of those authorized by Chapter 4 of this title nor shall any provision of this Code section be construed as permitting a bank to make loans in violation of Chapter 17 of Title 16.

History.

Code 1981, §

7-1-296

, enacted by Ga. L. 2018, p. 214, § 6/HB 780.

Effective date. —

This Code section became effective May 3, 2018. See Editor’s notes for applicability.

Editor’s notes.

Ga. L. 2018, p. 214, § 26(b)/HB 780, not codified by the General Assembly, provides that: “It is not the intent of the General Assembly to affect the law applicable to litigation pending as of March 9, 2018.”

Administrative rules and regulations.

Notification of intent to utilize a federal power, Official Compilation of the Rules and Regulations of the State of Georgia, Department of Banking and Finance, Banks, Applications, Registrations and Notifications, Rule 80-1-1-.12.